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DTC P0 180/39FuelTemperatureSensorCircuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The fuel temperature sensor senses the fuel temperature. A
thermistor built into the sensor changes the resistance value
according to the fuel temperature. The lower the fuel tempera-
ture, the greater the thermistor resistance value, and the higher
the fuel temperature, the lower the thermistor resistance value
(See Fig.1).
The fuel temperature sensor is connected to the engine ECU
(see next page). The 5 V power source voltage in the engine
ECU is applied to the fuel temperature sensor from the terminal
THF via resistor R. That is, the resistor R and the fuel tempera-
ture sensor are connected in series. When the resistance value
of the fuel temperature sensor changes, in accordance with
changes in the fuel temperature, the potential at the terminal
THF also changes. Based on this signal, the engine ECU in-
creases the fuel injection volume to improve driveability during
low engine revolution and high fuel temperature.

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

P0180/39 Openorshort in fuel temp.sensorcircuit for0.5sec.ormore
SOpenorshort in fuel temp.sensorcircuit

SFuel temp.sensor
SEngineECU

HINT:
When DTC P0180/39 is detected, check the engine coolant temperature by entering the following menus
on the intelligent tester II: Powertrain / Engine and ECT / Data List / Fuel Temp.

Temperature displayed Malfunction

−40˚ C (−40˚ F) Open circuit

140˚ C(284 ˚ F)ormore Short circuit
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WIRING DIAGRAM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
S If DTCs related to different systems that have terminal E2 as the ground terminal are output simulta-

neously, terminal E2 may have an open circuit.
S Read freeze frame data using the intelligent tester II. Freeze frame data records the engine conditions

when a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, freeze frame data can help determine if the
vehicle was running or stopped, if the engine was warmed up or not, and other data from the time the
malfunction occurred.

When using intelligent tester II:

1 Connect intelligent tester II, and read value of fuel temperature.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the intelligent tester II to the DLC3.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON and push the intelligent tester II main switch ON.
CHECK:
Read the temperature value on the intelligent tester II.
OK:

Same as actual fuel temperature.
HINT:
S If there is an open circuit, the intelligent tester II indicates −40˚ C (−40˚ F).
S If there is a short circuit, the intelligent tester II indicates 140˚ C (284˚ F) or more.

NG −40˚ C (−40˚ F) ...Gotostep2.
140˚ C(284 ˚ F)ormore ...Gotostep4.

OK

Check for intermittent problems (See page
DI−4) .
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2 Check for open in harness or engine ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the fuel temp. sensor connector.
(b) Connect sensor wire harness terminals together.
(c)Turn the ignitionswitchON.
CHECK:
Read the temperature value on the intelligent tester II.
OK:

Temperaturevalue: 140˚ C(284 ˚ F)ormore

OK Confirm good connection at sensor.
If OK, replace fuel temp. sensor.

NG

3 Check for open in harness or engine ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b)Connectbetween terminalsTHFandE2of theengine

ECU connector.
HINT:
Fuel temp. sensor connector is disconnected. Before checking,
do a visual and contact pressure check for the engine ECU con-
nector (see page IN−19).
(c) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Read the temperature value on the intelligent tester II.
OK:

Temperaturevalue: 140˚ C(284 ˚ F)ormore

OK Open in harness between terminal E2 or THF, re-
pair or replace harness.

NG

Confirm good connection at engine ECU. If
OK, replace engine ECU.
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4 Check for short in harness or engine ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the fuel temp. sensor connector.
(b)Turn the ignitionswitchON.
CHECK:
Read the temperaturevalueon the intelligent tester II.
OK:

Temperaturevalue: −40˚ C (−40˚ F)

OKReplacefuel temp.sensor.

NG

5 Check for short in harness or engine ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a)Remove theglovecompartmentdoor.
(b) Disconnect the E16 connector of the engine ECU.
HINT:
Fuel temp. sensor connector is disconnected.
(c) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Read the temperature value on the intelligent tester II.
OK:

Temperaturevalue: −40˚ C (−40˚ F)

OKRepairor replaceharnessorconnector.

NG

Check and replace engine ECU (See page
IN−1 9) .
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When not using intelligent tester II:

1 Check voltage between terminals THF and E2 of engine ECU connector.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure the voltage between terminals THF and E2 of the en-
gine ECU connecter.
OK:

Fuel temp. Voltage

20˚C (68˚F) (Engine is cool) 0.2 to 3.8 V

80˚C (176˚F) (Engine is hot) 0.1 to 1.5 V

OK Check for intermittent problems
(See page DI−4) .

NG

2 Check fuel temp. sensor (See Pub. No. RM617E on page ED−6).

NG Replace fuel temp. sensor.

OK

3 Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
fuel temp. sensor (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Check and replace engine ECU (See page
IN−1 9) .


